District of Columbia statutes.
42-3651.08

Final Accounting.

Within 30 calendar days after termination of a receivership, the receiver shall give the Court a complete accounting of all property with which he or she has been entrusted, all funds collected, and all expenses incurred.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 508, 48 DCR 1888